District of Columbia statutes.
34-1731.02

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Backhaul” means the transmission of voice and data traffic from the wireless network to a wireline network infrastructure.

(2)

“Census tracts” means geographical areas defined by median household income according to the most recent census for the District of Columbia published by the United States Bureau of the Census.

(3)

“Connectivity” means connection from a home to a telecommunications provider’s network.

(4)

“DC-Net” means the District government’s telecommunications service network and information technology infrastructure.

(5)

“Digitally-disadvantaged areas” means census tracts in the District of Columbia with median income below the median income in the District as a whole.

(6)

“Digitally-disadvantaged population” means low-income residents of the District of Columbia.

(7)

“Digitally-disadvantaged residents” means residents of digitally-disadvantaged areas.

(8)

“Digitally-disadvantaged resident household” means all digitally-disadvantaged residents residing at a fixed single-family address in the District of Columbia that define themselves as a family unit.

(9)

“District telecommunications assets” means nonexclusive access to District-owned pole-mounted street light fixtures and buildings and backhaul on DC-Net from selected District locations to carrier hotel at 1275 K Street N.W., Washington, D.C., for Internet-related services.

(10)

“Franchisee” means a person or entity that enters into a franchise agreement pursuant to a successful bid and award.

(11)

“Low-income resident” means any District of Columbia resident whose income meets the eligibility standards for reduced price meals according to the Eligibility Guidelines for Free and Reduced Price Meals for the National School Lunch Program, as established annually pursuant to sections 9(b)(1) and 17(c)(4) of AN ACT To provide assistance to the States in the establishment, maintenance, operation, and expansion of school lunch programs, and for other purposes, approved June 4, 1946 (60 Stat. 233; 42 U.S.C. §§ 1758(b)(1) and 1766(c)(4)), and sections 3(a)(6) and 4(e)(1)(A) of the Child Nutrition Act of 1966, approved October 11, 1966 (80 Stat. 885; 42 U.S.C. §§ 1772 (a)(6) and 1773(e)(1)(A)).

(12)

“OCTO” means Office of the Chief Technology Officer.

(13)

“Package of services for digitally-disadvantaged residents” means some combination of connectivity, computers, software, computer training, support, and Internet service provider services.

(14)

“RFI” means a request for information.

(15)

“RFP” means a request for proposals.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-210, § 3, 53 DCR 9122

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Digital Inclusion Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-467, July 25, 2006, 53 DCR 6754).

Emergency Legislation